Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2355.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 45-402, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-402. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Accounting period" means the calendar year, except such other twelve-month period as may be otherwise agreed on by the director and the owner of a farm or a district on behalf of its landowners. 2. "Active management area" means a geographical geographic area that has been designated pursuant to article 2 of this chapter as requiring active management of groundwater or, in the case of the Santa Cruz active management area, active management of any water, other than stored water, withdrawn from a well. 3. "Animal industry use" means the production, growing and feeding of livestock, range livestock or poultry, as such those terms are defined in section 3-1201. Animal industry use is included in the term and general treatment of industry in this chapter, unless specifically provided otherwise. 4. "City" or "town" means a city or town incorporated or chartered under the constitution and laws of this state. 5. "Conservation district" means a multi-county water conservation district established under title 48, chapter 22. 6. "Convey" means to transfer the ownership of a grandfathered right from one person to another. 7. "Date of the designation of the active management area" means: (a) With respect to an initial active management area, June 12, 1980. (b) With respect to a subsequent active management area, the date on which the director's order designating the active management area becomes effective as provided in section 45-414 or the date on which the final results of an election approving the establishment of the active management area pursuant to section 45-415 are certified by the board of supervisors of the county or counties in which the active management area is located. 8. "Exempt well" means a well that has a pump with a maximum capacity of not more than thirty-five gallons per minute and that is used to withdraw groundwater pursuant to section 45-454. 9. "Expanded animal industry use" means increased water use by an animal industrial enterprise on the land in use by the enterprise on June 12, 1980 or on immediately adjoining land, excluding irrigation uses. 10. "Farm" means an area of irrigated land that is under the same ownership, that is served by a water distribution system common to the irrigated land and to which can be applied common conservation, water measurement and water accounting procedures. 11. "Farm unit" means: (a) With respect to areas outside an active management area and with respect to an active management area other than the Santa Cruz active management area, one or more farms that are irrigated with groundwater and that are contiguous or in proximity to each other with similar soil conditions, crops and cropping patterns. (b) With respect to the Santa Cruz active management area, one or more farms that are irrigated with water, other than stored water, withdrawn from a well and that are contiguous or in proximity to each other with similar soil conditions, crops and cropping patterns. 12. "Grandfathered right" means a right to withdraw and use groundwater pursuant to article 5 of this chapter based on the fact of lawful withdrawals and use of groundwater before the date of the designation of an active management area. 13. "Groundwater basin" means an area that, as nearly as known facts allow as determined by the director pursuant to this chapter, may be designated so as to enclose a relatively hydrologically distinct body or related bodies of groundwater, which shall be described horizontally by surface description. 14. "Groundwater replenishment district" or "replenishment district" means a district that is established pursuant to title 48, chapter 27. 15. "Groundwater withdrawal permit" means a permit issued by the director pursuant to article 7 of this chapter. 16. "Initial active management area" means the Phoenix, Prescott or Pinal active management area established by section 45-411, the Tucson active management area established by section 45-411 and modified by section 45-411.02 and the Santa Cruz active management area established by section 45-411.03. 17. "Integrated farming operation" means: (a) With respect to land within an irrigation non-expansion area, more than ten acres of land that are contiguous or in close proximity, that may be irrigated pursuant to section 45-437, that are not under the same ownership and that are farmed as a single farming operation. (b) With respect to land within an active management area, outside of an irrigation non-expansion area, two or more farms that are contiguous or in close proximity, that collectively have more than ten irrigation acres and that are farmed as a single farming operation. 18. "Irrigate" means to apply water to two or more acres of land to produce plants or parts of plants for sale or human consumption, or for use as feed for livestock, range livestock or poultry, as such those terms are defined in section 3-1201. 19. "Irrigation acre" means an acre of land, as determined in section 45-465, subsection B, to which an irrigation grandfathered right is appurtenant. 20. "Irrigation district" means a political subdivision, however designated, established pursuant to title 48, chapter 17 or 19. 21. "Irrigation grandfathered right" means a grandfathered right determined pursuant to section 45-465. 22. "Irrigation non-expansion area" means a geographical geographic area that has been designated pursuant to article 3 of this chapter as having insufficient groundwater to provide a reasonably safe supply for the irrigation of the cultivated lands at the current rate of withdrawal. 23. "Irrigation use" means: (a) With respect to areas outside an active management area and with respect to an active management area other than the Santa Cruz active management area, the use of groundwater on two or more acres of land to produce plants or parts of plants for sale or human consumption, or for use as feed for livestock, range livestock or poultry, as such those terms are defined in section 3-1201. (b) With respect to the Santa Cruz active management area, the use of water, other than stored water, withdrawn from a well on two or more acres of land to produce plants or parts of plants for sale or human consumption, or for use as feed for livestock, range livestock or poultry, as such those terms are defined in section 3-1201. 24. "Irrigation water duty" or "water duty" means the amount of water in acre-feet per acre that is reasonable to apply to irrigated land in a farm unit during the accounting period, as determined by the director pursuant to sections 45-564 through 45-568 or as prescribed in section 45-483. 25. "Member land" means real property that qualifies as a member land of a conservation district as provided by title 48, chapter 22. 26. "Member service area" means the service area of a city, town or private water company that qualifies as a member service area of a conservation district as provided by title 48, chapter 22. 27. "Non-irrigation grandfathered right" means a grandfathered right determined pursuant to section 45-463, 45-464, 45-469 or 45-472. 28. "Non-irrigation use" means: (a) With respect to areas outside an active management area and with respect to an active management area other than the Santa Cruz active management area, a use of groundwater other than an irrigation use. (b) With respect to the Santa Cruz active management area, a use of water, other than stored water, withdrawn from a well, other than an irrigation use. 29. "Person" means an individual, public or private corporation, company, partnership, firm, association, society, estate or trust, any other private organization or enterprise, the United States, any state, territory or country or a governmental entity, political subdivision or municipal corporation organized under or subject to the constitution and laws of this state. 30. "Private water company" means: (a) With respect to areas outside an active management area and with respect to an active management area other than the Santa Cruz active management area, any entity that distributes or sells groundwater, except a political subdivision or an entity that is established pursuant to title 48 and that is not regulated as a public service corporation by the Arizona corporation commission under a certificate of public convenience and necessity. A city or town is not a private water company. (b) With respect to the Santa Cruz active management area, any entity that distributes or sells water, other than stored water, withdrawn from a well, except a political subdivision or an entity that is established pursuant to title 48 and that is not regulated as a public service corporation by the Arizona corporation commission under a certificate of public convenience and necessity. A city or town is not a private water company. 31. "Service area" means: (a) With respect to a city or town, the area of land actually being served water, for a non-irrigation use, by the city or town plus: (i) Additions to such area that contain an operating distribution system owned by the city or town primarily for the delivery of water for a non-irrigation use. (ii) The service area of a city, town or private water company that obtains its water from the city pursuant to a contract entered into before the date of the designation of the active management area. (b) With respect to a private water company, the area of land of the private water company actually being served water, for a non-irrigation use, by the private water company plus additions to such area that contain an operating distribution system owned by the private water company primarily for the delivery of water for a non-irrigation use. 32. "Service area of an irrigation district" means: (a) With respect to an irrigation district that was engaged in the withdrawal, delivery and distribution of groundwater as of the date of the designation of the active management area, the area of land within the boundaries of the irrigation district actually being served water by the irrigation district at any time during the five years preceding the date of the designation of the active management area plus any areas as of the date of the designation of the active management area within the boundaries of the irrigation district that contain an operating system of canals, flumes, ditches and other works owned or operated by the irrigation district. The service area may be modified pursuant to section 45-494.01. (b) With respect to an irrigation district that was not engaged in the withdrawal, delivery and distribution of groundwater as of the date of the designation of the active management area: (i) The acres of member lands within the boundaries of the irrigation district that were legally irrigated at any time from January 1, 1975 through January 1, 1980 for initial active management areas or during the five years preceding the date of the designation of the active management area for subsequent active management areas. (ii) Any areas of land that contain an operating system of canals, flumes, ditches and other works owned or operated by the irrigation district for the withdrawal, delivery and distribution of water, except that additional areas containing an operating system of canals, flumes, ditches and other works owned or operated by the irrigation district may not be added after December 31, 2027. 33. "Stored water" means water that is stored underground for the purpose of recovery pursuant to a permit issued under chapter 3.1 of this title. 34. "Subbasin" means an area that, as nearly as known facts allow as determined by the director pursuant to this chapter, may be designated so as to enclose a relatively hydrologically distinct body of groundwater within a groundwater basin, which shall be described horizontally by surface description. 35. "Subsequent active management area" means an active management area established after June 12, 1980 pursuant to article 2 of this chapter. 36. "Subsidence" means the settling or lowering of the surface of land that results from the withdrawal of groundwater. 37. "Transportation" means the movement of groundwater from the point of withdrawal to the point of use. 38. "Type 1 non-irrigation grandfathered right" means a non-irrigation grandfathered right associated with retired irrigated land and determined pursuant to section 45-463, 45-469 or 45-472. 39. "Type 2 non-irrigation grandfathered right" means a non-irrigation grandfathered right not associated with retired irrigated land and determined pursuant to section 45-464. 40. "Water district" means an active management area water district that is established under title 48, chapter 28 and that has adopted an ordinance or resolution to undertake water district groundwater replenishment obligations as defined and used in title 48, chapter 28, article 7. 41. "Water district member land" means real property that qualifies as water district member land of a water district as provided by title 48, chapter 28. 42. "Water district member service area" means the service area of the city, town or private water company that qualifies as a water district member service area of a water district as provided by title 48, chapter 28. 43. "Well" means a man-made opening in the earth through which water may be withdrawn or obtained from beneath the surface of the earth except as provided in section 45-591.01. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 45-604, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-604. Water measuring devices A. Except as provided in subsections B, C, and D and E of this section, a person who withdraws groundwater from a nonexempt well in an active management area or an irrigation non-expansion area, a person who withdraws water from a non-exempt nonexempt well in the Santa Cruz active management area, or a person who withdraws groundwater for transportation to an initial active management area pursuant to article 8.1 of this chapter or a person who withdraws groundwater from a nonexempt well under any other circumstances and in any other location shall use a water measuring device approved by the director. B. A person who holds a type 2 non-irrigation grandfathered right or a groundwater withdrawal permit in the amount of ten or fewer acre-feet per year is not required to use a water measuring device to measure withdrawals pursuant to that grandfathered right or groundwater withdrawal permit unless the person holds more than one such right or permit in the aggregate amount of more than ten acre-feet per year and withdraws more than ten acre-feet of groundwater per year pursuant to those rights or permits from one well. C. In an irrigation non-expansion area: 1. A person who withdraws ten or fewer acre-feet of groundwater per year from a non-exempt nonexempt well for a non-irrigation use is not required to use a water measuring device to measure withdrawals from that well. 2. A person who withdraws groundwater from a non-exempt nonexempt well for an irrigation use is not required to use a water measuring device to measure withdrawals from that well if both of the following apply: (a) Groundwater withdrawn from the well for an irrigation use is used only on land that is owned by a person who has the right under section 45-437 to irrigate ten or fewer contiguous acres at the place of the use. (b) Groundwater withdrawn from the well is not used on land that is part of an integrated farming operation. D. In an active management area, a person, other than an irrigation district, who withdraws groundwater from a non-exempt nonexempt well for use pursuant to an irrigation grandfathered right that is appurtenant to ten or fewer irrigation acres is not required to use a water measuring device to measure withdrawals from that well unless groundwater withdrawn from the well is also used pursuant to either a service area right pursuant to article 6 of this chapter or a grandfathered groundwater right other than an irrigation grandfathered right that is appurtenant to irrigation acres that are exempt from irrigation water duties pursuant to section 45-563.02. E. For a nonexempt well other than a NONEXEMPT well prescribed by subsections B, C and D of this section: 1. A person who withdraws ten or fewer acre-feet of groundwater per year from a nonexempt well for a non-irrigation use is not required to use a water measuring device to measure withdrawals from that well. 2. A person who withdraws groundwater from a nonexempt well for an irrigation use is not required to use a water measuring device to measure withdrawals from that well if both of the following apply: (a) Groundwater withdrawn from the well for an irrigation use is used only on land that is owned by a person who has the right to irrigate ten or fewer contiguous acres at the place of the use. (b) Groundwater withdrawn from the well is not used on land that is part of an integrated farming operation. E. F. The director shall adopt rules setting forth the requirements and specifications for water measuring devices. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 45-632, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-632. Records and annual report of groundwater pumping, transportation and use; penalty A. Each person who is required to file an annual report under this section or who files an annual report under subsection E of this section shall maintain current accurate records of the person's withdrawals, transportation, deliveries and use of groundwater and, in the Santa Cruz active management area, current accurate records of the person's withdrawals, deliveries and use of all water withdrawn from a well, as prescribed by the director under subsection P  Q of this section. B. Except as provided in subsections C and D of this section, an annual report shall be filed with the director by each person who: 1. Owns or leases a right under this chapter to withdraw, receive or use groundwater in an active management area, unless a report is filed for that person by an irrigation district under subsection E of this section or by another person in a form acceptable to the director. 2. Uses groundwater which that is transported from an active management area. 3. Is an individual user subject to a municipal conservation requirement for appropriate conservation measures included in a management plan adopted by the director pursuant to article 9 of this chapter. 4. Withdraws groundwater for transportation to an initial active management area pursuant to article 8.1 of this chapter. 5. Withdraws water from a well in the Santa Cruz active management area or who uses water, other than stored water, withdrawn from a non-exempt nonexempt well in the Santa Cruz active management area. 6. Withdraws groundwater from a nonexempt well in a location outside of an active management area and outside of an irrigation non-expansion area, except that a person who withdraws groundwater for an irrigation use from a nonexempt well is exempt from annual reporting requirements if the groundwater is used only on land that is owned by a person who has the right to irrigate ten or fewer contiguous acres at the place of use and the land is not part of an integrated farming operation of more than ten acres. C. Persons who withdraw groundwater from exempt wells and non-irrigation customers of cities, towns, private water companies and irrigation districts, except customers receiving water pursuant to a permit, are exempt from the record keeping recordkeeping and reporting requirements of this section for such water. D. A person who owns or leases an irrigation grandfathered right that is appurtenant to ten or fewer irrigation acres is exempt from the record keeping and reporting requirements of this section for the irrigation grandfathered right unless one of the following applies: 1. The land to which the irrigation grandfathered right is appurtenant is part of an integrated farming operation. 2. Groundwater is withdrawn from the land to which the irrigation grandfathered right is appurtenant and delivered for use pursuant to either a service area right pursuant to article 6 of this chapter or a grandfathered groundwater right other than an irrigation grandfathered right that is appurtenant to irrigation acres that are exempt from irrigation water duties pursuant to section 45-563.02. 3. Groundwater is withdrawn from land that is both owned by the owner of the irrigation grandfathered right and contiguous to the land to which the irrigation grandfathered right is appurtenant and delivered for use pursuant to either a service area right pursuant to article 6 of this chapter or a grandfathered groundwater right other than an irrigation grandfathered right that is appurtenant to irrigation acres that are exempt from irrigation water duties pursuant to section 45-563.02. E. An irrigation district which that delivers and distributes groundwater in an active management area may file an annual report with the director for each person who holds an irrigation grandfathered right appurtenant to irrigation acres within the service area of the irrigation district, if the irrigation district delivers all the water used on the person's irrigation acres. If an irrigation district files an annual report for such a person, the irrigation district shall report the following information for each such person: 1. The name of the person and the certificate number of the person's irrigation grandfathered right. 2. The quantity of groundwater, if any, delivered during the calendar year. F. Persons who are required to report under subsection B, paragraph 1 of this section and who withdraw groundwater during the calendar year in an active management area shall report the following information for each well: 1. The registration number and location of the well. 2. The quantity of groundwater withdrawn from the well during the calendar year. A person who, under section 45-604, subsection B, is not required to use and does not use a water measuring device to measure withdrawals made pursuant to a type 2 non-irrigation grandfathered right or a groundwater withdrawal permit shall estimate the quantity of groundwater withdrawn pursuant to the grandfathered right or withdrawal permit. 3. The quantity of fuel or electricity consumed by the pump during the calendar year. 4. The uses to which the groundwater was applied or the persons to whom the groundwater was delivered during the calendar year. G. Persons who are required to report under subsection B, paragraph 1 of this section and who use groundwater during the calendar year in an active management area and persons who are required to report under subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section shall report the following information: 1. The source of the groundwater, including: (a) The name of the person from whom the groundwater was obtained. (b) The registration number and location of the well, if known. 2. The quantity of groundwater used during the calendar year. 3. The specific uses to which the groundwater was applied during the calendar year. H. Persons who are required to report under subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section and who transport groundwater during the calendar year to an initial active management area under article 8.1 of this chapter shall report the following information: 1. The registration number and location of each well. 2. The quantity of groundwater withdrawn from each well during the calendar year. 3. The quantity of groundwater transported during the calendar year to an initial active management area. 4. The quantity of groundwater that was withdrawn during the calendar year and that was not transported to an initial active management area and the uses to which the groundwater was applied. 5. The quantity of fuel or electricity consumed by each pump during the calendar year. 6. The uses to which the groundwater was applied or the persons to whom the groundwater was delivered during the calendar year. I. Persons who are required to report under subsection B, paragraph 1 of this section and who neither withdraw nor use groundwater during the calendar year shall report the following information: 1. The fact that no groundwater was withdrawn or used during the calendar year. 2. The registration number and location of each well, if any. J. Persons who are required to report under subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section and who withdraw water from a non-exempt nonexempt well in the Santa Cruz active management area during the calendar year shall report the following information: 1. The registration number and location of the well. 2. The quantity of water, by type, withdrawn from the well during the calendar year. 3. The quantity of fuel or electricity consumed by the pump during the calendar year. 4. The uses to which the water groundwater was applied or the persons to whom the water was delivered during the calendar year. K. Persons who are required to report under subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section and who use water withdrawn from a non-exempt nonexempt well in the Santa Cruz active management area during the calendar year shall report the following information: 1. The source of the water, including: (a) The name of the person from whom the water was obtained. (b) The registration number and location of the well, if known. 2. The quantity of the water, by type, used during the calendar year. 3. The specific uses to which the water was applied during the calendar year. L. Persons who are required to report under subsection B, paragraph 6 of this section and who withdraw groundwater from a nonexempt well during the calendar year shall report the following information: 1. The registration number and location of the well. 2. The quantity of groundwater withdrawn from the well during the calendar year, except that a person who, under section 45-604, subsection E, paragraph 1, is not required to use a water measuring device shall estimate the quantity of groundwater withdrawn. 3. The quantity of fuel or electricity consumed by the pump during the calendar year. 4. The uses to which the groundwater was applied or the persons to whom the groundwater was delivered during the calendar year. 5. The quantity of the groundwater used during the calendar year. L. M. If a person both withdraws groundwater in an active management area and uses such water, the person may combine the information required by subsections F and G of this section into one report. If a person both withdraws water, other than stored water, from a non-exempt well in the Santa Cruz active management area and uses such water, the person may combine the information required by subsections J and K of this section into one report. M. N. The director may require such other information in the report as may be necessary to accomplish the management goals of the applicable active management area. N. O. Each report shall contain either a sworn statement or a certification, under penalty of perjury, that the information contained in the report is true and correct according to the best belief and knowledge of the person filing the report. O. P. The annual report shall be maintained on a calendar year basis and shall be filed with the director no later than March 31 of each year for the preceding calendar year. If a person who is required under this section to file an annual report for calendar year 1985 or any subsequent calendar year fails to file a report for the calendar year in question on or before March 31 of the following year, the director may assess and collect a penalty of twenty-five dollars $25 for each month or portion of a month that the annual report is delinquent. The total penalty assessed under this subsection shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars $150. The director shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all penalties collected under this subsection in the state general fund. P. Q. The records and reports required to be kept and filed under this section shall be in such form as the director prescribes. The director shall prepare blank forms and distribute them on a timely schedule throughout each active management area and furnish them upon on request. Failure to receive or obtain the forms does not relieve any person from keeping the required records or making any required report. The director shall cooperate with cities and towns, private water companies and irrigation districts in establishing the form of the records and reports to be kept and filed by them. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 45-2602, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-2602. Establishment of southside protection zones; reporting requirements A. The following southside protection zones are established on the effective date of this section December 14, 2007: 1. The eastern protection zone north. 2. The eastern protection zone south. 3. The western municipal and industrial protection zone. 4. The western municipal protection zone. 5. The central protection zone. B. The boundaries of the southside protection zones established under subsection A of this section are shown on the maps that are dated March 25, 2002 and that are on file in the department.  The maps shall be available for examination by the public during regular business hours. C. Each person in the Pinal active management area who withdraws underground water during a calendar year in a southside protection zone established under this section, other than the central protection zone, shall file an annual report with the director no later than March 31 of each year for the preceding calendar year.  The report shall contain the following information in addition to any other information required by section 45-632: 1. The amount of underground water withdrawn within the southside protection zone and the name of the protection zone. 2. If the underground water was used for a nonirrigation use, the purpose for which the underground water was used, the location of the use, the acreage of the parcel or parcels of land on which the underground water was used and the date the use commenced. 3. The amount of any water replenished during the year pursuant to section 45-2611, subsection B, paragraph 2, the water use for which the water was replenished and the manner in which the water was replenished. 4. The amount of any water replaced during the year pursuant to section 45-2611, subsection B, paragraph 3, the water use for which the water was replaced and the manner in which the water was replaced. D. A person who is required to file an annual report for a year under subsection C of this section: 1. Shall use a water measuring device approved by the director unless exempt under section 45-604. 2. Shall maintain current accurate records of the person's withdrawals, transportation, deliveries and use of underground water as prescribed by the director. 3. May combine the report with an annual report for the same year filed under section 45-632. 4. Shall comply with the requirements prescribed in section 45-632, subsections N, O, and P and Q and is subject to the penalties prescribed in section 45-632, subsection O P as if the report was required by section 45-632. E. A person who withdraws underground water from an exempt well is exempt from the record keeping and reporting requirements of subsections C and D of this section.  For the purposes of this subsection, "exempt well" means a well that has a pump with a maximum capacity of not more than thirty-five gallons per minute, that is used to withdraw underground water and that would qualify as an exempt well under section 45-454 if used to withdraw groundwater. F. If stored water is withdrawn in the Pinal active management area in a southside protection zone established under this section, other than the central protection zone, the annual report filed under section 45-875.01, subsection D shall include: 1. The amount of stored water withdrawn within the southside protection zone and the name of the protection zone. 2. If the stored water was used for a nonirrigation use, the purpose for which the water was used, the acreage of the parcel or parcels of land on which the water was used, the location of the use and the date the use commenced. 3. The identification of the storage facility in which the water was stored. 4. The amount of any water replenished during the year pursuant to section 45-2611, subsection B, paragraph 2, the water use for which the water was replenished and the manner in which the water was replenished. 5. The amount of any water replaced during the year pursuant to section 45-2611, subsection B, paragraph 3, the water use for which the water was replaced and the manner in which the water was replaced. END_STATUTE